District of Columbia statutes.
38-841.02

Nondiscrimination.

Each applicable school in the District shall operate its athletic programs in a manner that does not discriminate against students or staff on the basis of sex, gender, or gender identity.

Oct. 21, 2015, D.C. Law 21-29, § 3, 62 DCR 10884